Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 1 General Provisions
46-5-5.
Inclusion of local exchanges 495 and 567 in area code 404.

Local exchanges 495 and 567 shall be included in the current 404 area code on or before July 1, 1996, and removed from the 706 area code; provided, however, that if a geographic area of the 404 area code is designated as a different area code and such geographic area is contiguous to a part of the geographic area where local exchange 495 or 567 is operational, then nothing in this Code section shall prohibit local exchange 495 or 567 from being included in the newly designated area code.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“The Public Service Commission shall be required to conduct at least three hearings in locations outside the metropolitan areas of the state and accept evidence as to the costs, feasibility, and methodology of providing for toll free calling between two telephones where the central offices serving such telephones are within an extended area of service of not less than 22 miles of each other.
The methodology and analysis of the cost and feasibility of such toll free calling area shall be conducted under the supposition of an alternative system of regulation within the framework of Section 1 of this Act.
The commission shall conduct such hearings prior to November 30, 1995, and shall report its findings to the General Assembly no later than December 31, 1995.
The Public Service Commission shall conclude its consideration in Docket 4231-U of the expansion of local calling areas pursuant to its rules, including but not limited to all balloting and the formulation of an appropriate rate design, on or before January 1, 1996.
The implementation of the expanded calling areas shall be completed on or before July 1, 1996.”

Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1995 amendment of this section, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 333 (1995).

46-5-6.
Exclusive power and authority of the Public Service Commission to prescribe rules and regulations regarding public pay telephones.

The Public Service Commission shall have the exclusive power and authority to prescribe rules and regulations for the operation, maintenance, location, and deployment of public pay telephones within this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 848, § 3.

46-5-7.
Plan to ensure confidentiality of family violence shelters’ addresses and locations.

Prior to January 1, 2005, each person, corporation, or other entity that provides telephone service in this state and each person, corporation, or other entity that publishes, disseminates, or otherwise provides telephone directory information or listings of telephone subscribers in this state shall file a plan with the commission setting forth in detail how such person, corporation, or other entity will protect the confidentiality of the address or location of family violence shelters, as defined in Code Section 19-13-20, in this state. Such plan shall describe the manner in which the person, corporation, or other entity will identify all such shelters and the manner in which the person, corporation, or other entity will keep the location and address of such shelters confidential.

Such persons, corporations, and other entities shall update such plans at least every 24 months.

Such original and updated plans shall be approved by the commission within a reasonable time upon a determination that the plans are reasonably effective in identifying the family violence shelters in the state and in maintaining the confidentiality of the location and address of such family violence shelters. If the commission determines that a plan is inadequate, it shall state the basis on which the plan was determined to be inadequate and shall allow the person, corporation, or other entity filing such plan a period of not more than 30 days to file a revised plan that is acceptable to the commission.

Such plans shall not be open to examination by the public and shall be exempt from disclosure under the provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

Within three days of filing original plans or updates with the commission, each person, corporation, or other entity subject to this Code section shall submit a copy of all original plans, updated plans, and revised plans to the State Commission on Family Violence, which is authorized to provide comments concerning such plans to the commission in order to aid in review and approval of such plans.

The filing or approval of such plans shall not in any manner be a defense to any action or prosecution.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 765, § 2.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 17, 2004.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 765, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Family Violence Shelter Confidentiality Act of 2004.’ ”

46-5-8.
Termination of wireless communications service contracts by service members.

As used in this Code section, the term “service member” means an active duty member of the regular or reserve component of the United States armed forces, the United States Coast Guard, the Georgia National Guard, or the Georgia Air National Guard on ordered federal duty for a period of 90 days or longer.

Any service member may terminate his or her wireless telecommunications service contract by providing the wireless telecommunications provider with a written notice of termination, effective on the date specified in the notice, which date shall be at least 30 days after receipt of the notice by the wireless telecommunications provider, if any of the following criteria are met:

The service member is required, pursuant to a permanent change of station orders, to move outside the area served by the wireless telecommunications provider or to an area where the type of wireless telecommunications service being provided to the service member is not available from the wireless telecommunications provider;

The service member is discharged or released from active duty or state active duty and will return from such duty to an area not served by the wireless telecommunications provider or where the type of telecommunications service contracted for is not available from the wireless telecommunications provider;

The service member is released from active duty after having entered into a contract for wireless telecommunications service while on active duty status and the wireless telecommunications provider does not provide telecommunications service or the same type of wireless telecommunications service contracted for in the region of the service member’s home of record prior to entering active duty;

The service member receives military orders requiring him or her to move outside the continental United States; or

The service member receives temporary duty orders, temporary change of station orders, or active duty or state active duty orders to an area not served by the wireless telecommunications provider or where the type of wireless telecommunications service contracted for is not available from the wireless telecommunications provider, provided such orders are for a period exceeding 60 days.

The written notice to the wireless telecommunications provider must be accompanied by either a copy of the official military orders or a written verification signed by the service member’s commanding officer.

Upon termination of a contract under this Code section, the service member is liable for the amount due under the contract prorated to the effective date of the termination payable at such time as would have otherwise been required by the terms of the contract. The service member is not liable for any other fees due to the early termination of the contract as provided for in this Code section.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply to any contract for wireless telecommunications service entered into on or after July 1, 2005, and to any renewals, modifications, or extensions of any such contract in effect on such date and may not be waived or modified by the agreement of the parties under any circumstances.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 213, § 8/SB 258.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2005.

Cross references.

Additional contracts terminable by service members, §

13-1-16

.